Georgia, session 2025_26, HB192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
26 SECTION 1.
27 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Top State for Talent Act."
28 SECTION 2.
29 Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended by
30 revising Code Section 20-2-145.1, relating to career education, as follows:
31 "20-2-145.1.
32 The State Board of Education shall prescribe a minimum course of study in career
33 education for students in grades six through 12. Such minimum course of study shall be
34 age appropriate and shall include, but not be limited to, career exploration and career
35 oriented learning experiences in programs included in the High-demand Career List
36 published by the State Workforce Development Board as provided in Code Section
37 34-14-3. Career oriented learning experiences shall include, but not be limited to,
38 participation in work based learning programs such as internships, apprenticeships,
39 cooperative education, or employability skill development. The State Board of Education
40 shall ensure that career oriented learning experiences include rigorous industry
41 credentialing, as defined in Code Section 20-2-326, if such rigorous industry credentialing
42 has been created or endorsed by Georgia employers."
H. B. 192
- 2 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
43 SECTION 3.
44 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 20-2-159.1, relating to focused
45 programs of study, as follows:
46 "20-2-159.1.
47 (a) The Department of Education shall develop, and the State Board of Education shall
48 approve, state models and industry required content standards, after consultation with
49 industries in Georgia and in collaboration with the Technical College System of Georgia
50 and the University System of Georgia to ensure alignment with postsecondary
51 opportunities, for the following focused programs of study, as defined in Code Section
52 20-2-326, including, but not limited to:
53 (1) Agriculture, food, and natural resources;
54 (2) Architecture and construction;
55 (3) Arts, audio-video technology, and communications;
56 (4) Business, management, and administration;
57 (5) Education and training;
58 (6) Finance;
59 (7) Health science;
60 (8) Hospitality and tourism;
61 (9) Human services;
62 (10) Information technology;
63 (11) Law, public safety, and security;
64 (12) Manufacturing;
65 (13) Government and public administration;
66 (14) Marketing, sales, and service;
67 (15) Science, technology, engineering, and mathematics;
68 (16) Transportation, distribution, and logistics;
69 (17) Energy; and
H. B. 192
- 3 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
70 (18) Lifeguarding and aquatic safety.
71 (1) Advanced manufacturing;
72 (2) Construction;
73 (3) Supply chain and transportation;
74 (4) Arts, entertainment, and design;
75 (5) Hospitality, events, and tourism;
76 (6) Financial services;
77 (7) Education;
78 (8) Healthcare and human services;
79 (9) Public service and safety;
80 (10) Agriculture;
81 (11) Energy and natural resources;
82 (12) Digital technology;
83 (13) Marketing and sales; and
84 (14) Management and entrepreneurship.
85 Such focused programs of study may be combined around these and other related clusters.
86 (b) The focused programs of study established pursuant to this Code section may include
87 or be revised to include industry certifications or industry credentialing, as defined in Code
88 Section 20-2-326, pertinent to any such focused program of study. The After consultation
89 with employers and industries in Georgia, the Department of Education and the Technical
90 College System of Georgia shall jointly establish a list of industry credentials that are
91 required by Georgia employers, in alignment with programs included in the High-demand
92 Career List published by the State Workforce Development Board as provided in Code
93 Section 34-14-3. Such list shall be made available on the Department of Education and the
94 Technical College System of Georgia public websites. Such list shall be annually reviewed
95 and updated as appropriate and made available prior to the beginning of the annual
H. B. 192
- 4 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
96 competitive grant application process provided for in subsection (j) of Code Section
97 20-2-260."
98 SECTION 4.
99 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-2-161.3, relating to the "Dual Enrollment
100 Act," purpose, dual credit courses, eligibility for participation, eligibility for secondary
101 course credits, eligibility to meet high school graduation requirements, eligibility for award
102 of high school diploma, funding, limitations on total hours, exceptions, and eligibility for
103 payment, by revising subsection (d) as follows:
104 "(d) In consultation with and subject to approval by the commission, the department shall
105 develop appropriate forms and counseling guidelines for the program and shall make such
106 forms and guidelines available to eligible high schools and eligible postsecondary
107 institutions. No later than the first day of February each year, each eligible high school
108 shall provide general information about the program, including such forms, to all its
109 eligible high school students. An eligible high school shall also provide counseling
110 services to such students and their parents or guardians before the students enroll in the
111 program. Prior to participating in the program, the student and the student's parent or
112 guardian shall sign the form provided by the eligible high school or by an eligible
113 postsecondary institution stating that they have received the counseling specified in this
114 subsection and that they understand the responsibilities that shall be assumed in
115 participating in the program. Program information and materials shall be provided to each
116 eighth grade public school student at the time the student is developing his or her individual
117 graduation college and career plan as required by Code Section 20-2-327."
118 SECTION 5.
119 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 20-2-161.4, relating to accessing
120 HOPE scholarship funds for dual enrolled students and reports, as follows:
H. B. 192
- 5 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
121 "20-2-161.4.
122 (a)(1) Beginning July 1, 2023, each student participating in the Dual Enrollment program
123 provided for in Code Section 20-2-161.3 who is eligible for a HOPE grant pursuant to
124 Code Section 20-3-519.5 shall be allowed to access HOPE grant funds for eligible CTAE
125 courses, as defined in Code Section 20-2-161.3, irrespective of whether such student has
126 reached any maximum credit hour cap provided for in Code Section 20-2-161.3.
127 (2) For three years beginning on July 1, 2023, the Georgia Student Finance Commission,
128 in collaboration with the Technical College System of Georgia, shall collect and report
129 data on:
130 (A) Student enrollment in and completion of at least one eligible CTAE course, as
131 defined in Code Section 20-2-161.3, as part of the Dual Enrollment program provided
132 for in Code Section 20-2-161.3;
133 (B) HOPE grant funding and Dual Enrollment program funding, including, but not
134 limited to, the number of students who received such funding and the maximum, mean,
135 median, and mode amounts of such funding received by students;
136 (C) Postsecondary credits earned by students who received such funding;
137 (D) The number of students who enrolled in a postsecondary degree program after
138 completing a program of study that includes at least one eligible CTAE course, as
139 defined in Code Section 20-2-161.3, as part of the Dual Enrollment program provided
140 for in Code Section 20-2-161.3; and
141 (E) The number of students employed in a high-demand field after completing a
142 focused program of study identified by the State Board of the Technical College System
143 of Georgia as part of the High Demand Apprenticeship Program provided for in Code
144 Section 20-4-152.
145 No later than January 1 each year, the Georgia Student Finance Commission shall provide
146 an interim report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor President of the Senate, the
147 Speaker of the House of Representatives, the director of the Office of Planning and
H. B. 192
- 6 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
148 Budget, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Education, the Senate
149 Education and Youth Committee, the House Committee on Higher Education, and the
150 Senate Higher Education Committee. A final report shall be provided to the same no
151 later than December 1, 2027 2028.
152 (3) The Georgia Student Finance Commission, in consultation with the State Board of
153 Education, the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia, and the Office
154 of Workforce Development, shall establish rules and regulations to implement the
155 provisions of this subsection.
156 (b) This Code section shall stand repealed on June 30, 2027 2028."
157 SECTION 6.
158 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-2-260, relating to capital outlay funds
159 generally under the "Quality Basic Education Act," by revising subsection (j) as follows:
160 "(j) The State Board of Education shall establish an annual competitive grant program for
161 renovation, modernization, replacement, or purchase of equipment for the enhancement of
162 programs that are currently certified or in the process of achieving industry certification in
163 educational facilities that align with industry credentials on the list developed pursuant to
164 Code Section 20-2-159.1 or have been (1) linked to an occupation that addresses a critical
165 local or state-wide workforce need, (2) linked to an occupation that is identified as part of
166 the skilled trade industry, or (3) linked to an occupation that is identified in an emerging
167 field or technology aligned with the priority areas identified by the State Workforce
168 Development Board and included in the High-demand Career List published by the State
169 Workforce Development Board as provided in Code Section 34-14-3. The State Board of
170 Education in awarding grants shall give priority to local programs that demonstrate local
171 industry support and postsecondary partnerships that are linked to the verified industry
172 need."
H. B. 192
- 7 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
173 SECTION 7.
174 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 20-2-325, relating to the short title
175 relevant to the "Building Resourceful Individuals to Develop Georgia's Economy Act," as
176 follows:
177 "20-2-325.
178 This part shall be known and may be cited as the 'Building Resourceful Individuals to
179 Develop Georgia's Economy Act.' 'Top State for Talent Act.'"
180 SECTION 8.
181 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 20-2-326, relating to definitions
182 relevant to the "Building Resourceful Individuals to Develop Georgia's Economy Act," as
183 follows:
184 "20-2-326.
185 For purposes of this part, the term:
186 (1) 'Articulation' means agreement between a high school and a postsecondary institution
187 regarding the awarding of both secondary and postsecondary credit for a dual enrollment
188 course.
189 (2) 'Choice technical high school' means a high school, other than the high school to
190 which a student is assigned by virtue of his or her residence and attendance zone, which
191 is designed to prepare a high school student for postsecondary education and for
192 employment in a career field. A choice technical high school may be operated by a local
193 school system or a technical school or college. A choice technical high school may also
194 be operated as a charter school under a governance board composed of parents,
195 employers, and representatives from the local board of education.
196 (3) 'Chronically low-performing high school' means a public high school in this state that
197 has a graduation rate of less than 60 percent for three consecutive years, as determined
198 in accordance with methodology established by the National Governors Association's
H. B. 192
- 8 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
199 Compact on High School Graduation Data, or that has received an unacceptable rating
200 for three consecutive years, as defined by the Office of Student Achievement.
201 (4)(2) 'College and career academy' means a specialized school established as a charter
202 school or pursuant to a contract for a strategic waivers school system or charter system,
203 which formalizes a partnership that demonstrates a collaboration between business,
204 industry, and community stakeholders to advance work force development between one
205 or more local boards of education, a private individual, a private organization, or a state
206 or local public entity in cooperation with one or more postsecondary institutions.
207 (5)(3) 'Focused program of study' means a program of study with a rigorous academic
208 core combined with a focus in mathematics and science; a focus in humanities, fine arts,
209 and foreign language; or a coherent sequence of career pathway courses that is aligned
210 with graduation requirements established by the State Board of Education and content
211 standards established pursuant to Part 2 of this article that prepares a student for
212 postsecondary education or immediate employment after high school graduation.
213 (4) 'GAfutures.org' means the public website managed by the Georgia Student Finance
214 Commission to provide students with tools and information for higher education planning
215 and financial aid.
216 (5) 'Georgia MATCH' means the college admissions program for Georgia high school
217 students that is located at GAfutures.org.
218 (6) 'Individual college and career plan' 'Graduation plan' means a student specific plan
219 developed in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-327 detailing the
220 courses necessary for a high school student to graduate from high school and to
221 successfully transition to postsecondary education and the work force.
222 (7) 'Industry certification' means a process of program evaluation that ensures that
223 individual programs meet state, national, or international industry standards in the areas
224 of curriculum, teacher qualification, lab specifications, equipment, and industry
225 involvement.
H. B. 192
- 9 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
226 (7.1)(8) 'Industry credentialing' means a process through which students are assessed by
227 an independent third-party certifying entity using predetermined standards for knowledge,
228 skills, and competencies, resulting in the award of individual certification or state
229 licensure or an occupational competency that is state, nationally, or internationally
230 recognized.
231 (8)(9) 'Public college or university' means a two-year or four-year college, university, or
232 other institution under the auspices of the Board of Regents of the University System of
233 Georgia.
234 (9) 'Small learning community' means an autonomous or semiautonomous small learning
235 environment within a large high school which is made up of a subset of students and
236 teachers for a two-year, three-year, or four-year period. The goal of a small learning
237 community is to achieve greater personalization of learning with each community led by
238 a principal or instructional leader. A small learning community blends academic studies
239 around a broad career or academic theme where teachers have common planning time to
240 connect teacher assignments and assessments to college and career readiness standards.
241 Students voluntarily apply for enrollment in a small learning community but must be
242 accepted, and such enrollment must be approved by the student's parent or guardian. A
243 small learning community also includes a college and career academy organized around
244 a specific career theme which integrates academic and career instruction, provides work
245 based learning opportunities, and prepares students for postsecondary education and
246 employment, with support through partnerships with local employers, community
247 organizations, and postsecondary institutions.
248 (10) 'Teacher adviser system' means a system where an individual professional educator
249 in the school who assists a small group of students and their parents or guardians
250 throughout the students' high school careers to set postsecondary goals and help them
251 prepare programs of study, utilizing assessments and other data to track academic
H. B. 192
- 10 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
252 progress on a regular basis; communicates frequently with parents or guardians; and
253 provides advisement, support, and encouragement as needed.
254 (11) 'Technical school or college' means a college, institution, or other branch unit of the
255 Technical College System of Georgia."
256 SECTION 9.
257 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-2-327, relating to recognition of advanced
258 proficiency/honors courses and counseling and development of individual graduation plans
259 relevant to the "Building Resourceful Individuals to Develop Georgia's Economy Act," by
260 revising subsection (c) as follows:
261 "(c)(1) Students in the sixth, seventh, and eighth grades six through 12 shall be provided
262 counseling, advisement, career awareness, career interest and career demand inventories,
263 and information to assist them in evaluating their academic skills, career oriented
264 aptitudes, and career interests. Before the end of the second semester of the eighth grade,
265 students shall develop an individual graduation college and career plan based on their
266 academic skills, career oriented aptitudes, and career interests in consultation with their
267 parents, guardians, or individuals appointed by the parents or guardians to serve as their
268 designee. A student's individual graduation college and career plan shall be taken into
269 consideration when scheduling a student's courses in ninth grade. High school students
270 shall be provided guidance, advisement, and counseling annually that will enable them
271 to successfully update and implement their individual graduation college and career
272 plans, preparing them for a seamless transition to postsecondary study, further training,
273 or employment, including information regarding occupations, degrees, industry
274 credentials, certifications, and technical skills; work-ready skills in demand by Georgia
275 employers through the department's career pipeline website; and other career related
276 inventories made available through the Technical College System of Georgia or the
277 Office of Student Achievement. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, such
H. B. 192
- 11 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
278 guidance, advisement, and counseling for high school students shall include providing
279 career oriented aptitude and career interest guidance information. An individual
280 graduation college and career plan shall:
281 (A) Include rigorous academic core subjects and focused coursework in mathematics
282 and science or in humanities, fine arts, and foreign language or sequenced career
283 pathway coursework;
284 (B) Incorporate provisions of a student's Individualized Education Program (IEP),
285 where applicable;
286 (C) Align educational and broad career goals and a student's course of study;
287 (D) Be based on the student's selected academic and career focus area as approved by
288 the student's parent or guardian;
289 (E) Include experience based, career oriented learning experiences which may include,
290 but not be limited to, participation in work based learning programs such as internships,
291 apprenticeships, cooperative education, and employability skill development;
292 (F) Include any applicable industry credentialing that pertains to the student's focused
293 program of study;
294 (G) Include opportunities for postsecondary studies through articulation, dual
295 enrollment, and joint enrollment;
296 (H) Be flexible to allow change in the course of study but be sufficiently structured to
297 meet graduation requirements and qualify the student for admission to postsecondary
298 education; and
299 (I) Be approved by the student and the student's parent or guardian with guidance from
300 the student's school counselor or teacher adviser;
301 (J) Include, beginning in the ninth grade, the creation and utilization of a GAfutures
302 account at GAfutures.org; and
303 (K) Include the utilization of Georgia MATCH.
H. B. 192
- 12 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
304 (2) An individual graduation college and career plan shall be reviewed annually, and
305 revised, if appropriate, upon approval by the student and the student's parent or guardian
306 with guidance from the student's school counselor or teacher adviser. An individual
307 graduation college and career plan may be changed at any time throughout a student's
308 high school career upon approval by the student and the student's parent or guardian with
309 guidance from the student's school counselor or teacher adviser.
310 (3) The Georgia Student Finance Commission and the Department of Education shall
311 annually collect and report on information to verify compliance with this Code section."
312 SECTION 10.
313 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 20-2-327.1, relating to industry
314 credentialing for career, technical, and agricultural education programs and reporting relevant
315 to the "Building Resourceful Individuals to Develop Georgia's Economy Act," as follows:
316 "20-2-327.1.
317 (a) The State Board of Education, in collaboration with the Technical College System of
318 Georgia, shall facilitate and encourage industry credentialing for career, technical, and
319 agricultural education programs utilizing existing career pathways and individual
320 graduation college and career plans. Further, local school systems are authorized and
321 encouraged to align competency based career education, along with enhanced work based
322 learning experiences, as provided for in Code Section 20-2-161.2, to facilitate and make
323 available to students opportunities to receive industry credentialing in critical and emerging
324 occupations in Georgia programs included in the High-demand Career List published by
325 the State Workforce Development Board as provided in Code Section 34-14-3.
326 (b) No later than December 31, 2018, and annually thereafter, the Department of
327 Education shall produce a return-on-investment report identifying the industry
328 credentialing attainment levels for the previous calendar year to the State Workforce
329 Development Board and the Office of Planning and Budget as related to grant funds
H. B. 192
- 13 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
330 provided for in subsection (j) Code Section 20-2-260. Such report shall include the current
331 and projected regional business and industry needs for the purpose of establishing annual
332 goals and strategies to increase attainment rates of industry credentialing, including the
333 development of additional industry credentials to enhance current industry certified
334 programs."
335 SECTION 11.
336 Said title is further amended by repealing and reserving Code Section 20-2-328, relating to
337 a competitive grant program relevant to the "Building Resourceful Individuals to Develop
338 Georgia's Economy Act."
339 SECTION 12.
340 Said title is further amended by repealing Code Section 20-2-329, relating to requirements
341 for high schools that receive reform grants as chronically low-performing high schools
342 relevant to the "Building Resourceful Individuals to Develop Georgia's Economy Act," and
343 enacting a new Code section to read as follows:
344 "20-2-329.
345 The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out
346 the provisions of this part."
347 SECTION 13.
348 Said title is further amended by repealing Code Section 20-2-329.1, relating to rules and
349 regulations relevant to the "Building Resourceful Individuals to Develop Georgia's Economy
350 Act."
H. B. 192
- 14 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
351 SECTION 14.
352 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-2-2065, relating to waiver of provisions of
353 this title, requirements for operating, and control and management relevant to the "Charter
354 Schools Act of 1998," by revising paragraph (14) of subsection (b) as follows:
355 "(14) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-327 relating to
356 individual graduation college and career plans; and"
357 SECTION 15.
358 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-4-11, relating to powers of the State Board
359 of the Technical College System of Georgia, by inserting "and" at the end of subparagraph
360 (A) of paragraph (3), replacing the semicolon at the end of subparagraph (B) of such
361 paragraph with a period, and repealing subparagraph (C) of such paragraph.
362 SECTION 16.
363 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 20-4-20, relating to authority of Board
364 of Regents of University System of Georgia unabridged, agreements with the State Board of
365 the Technical College System of Georgia, and awarding transferable postsecondary course
366 credits, as follows:
367 "20-4-20.
368 (a) Nothing in this article shall abridge the authority of the Board of Regents of the
369 University System of Georgia to establish or operate colleges or of local boards of
370 education to operate schools.
371 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (a) of this Code section to the contrary:
372 (1) The Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, the State Board of
373 Education, and local boards of education are encouraged and expected:
374 (A) To work continuously with the State Board of the Technical College System of
375 Georgia to develop and implement policies, programs, and practices that promote and
H. B. 192
- 15 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
376 advance the objectives of serving student needs, avoiding duplication of mission, using
377 state resources efficiently, and expanding opportunities for postsecondary degree
378 attainment in Georgia; and
379 (B) Consistent with the objectives stated in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, to enter
380 into and amend existing agreements with the Technical College System of Georgia for
381 awarding postsecondary course credits that are transferable between units institutions
382 of the university system, and units of the technical college system, and the State Board
383 of Education; and
384 (2) The Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, and the State Board of
385 the Technical College System of Georgia, and the State Board of Education are
386 encouraged and expected to promote and allow units institutions of the university system
387 and units of the technical college system to enter into and amend existing agreements:
388 (A) For awarding postsecondary course credits that are transferable between such units
389 institutions of the university system, and units of the technical college system, and the
390 State Board of Education; and
391 (B) That are consistent with the objectives stated in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1)
392 of this subsection."
393 SECTION 17.
394 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-14-26, relating to duties relevant to the
395 Office of Student Achievement, by inserting "and" at the end of paragraph (3) of subsection
396 (a), replacing "; and" at the end of paragraph (4) of such subsection with a period, and by
397 repealing paragraph (5) of such subsection.
H. B. 192
- 16 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
398 SECTION 18.
399 Chapter 14 of Title 34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the State
400 Workforce Development Board, is amended by revising Code Section 34-14-3, relating to
401 High-demand Career List, as follows:
402 "34-14-3.
403 (a) The State Workforce Development Board shall develop and approve a High-demand
404 Career List that shall identify those careers most critical to the state's current and future
405 workforce needs. The State Workforce Development Board, in consultation with the
406 Office of Workforce Development, shall assess current labor market information and other
407 employment data sources and determine which careers merit inclusion on such list,
408 regionally or state wide, and shall implement a data-driven process to assess present and
409 future growing and declining industries, occupations, skills, and credentials. As directed
410 by the Governor, the State Workforce Development Board shall coordinate and collaborate
411 with the Office of Student Achievement, the Department of Education, the Technical
412 College System of Georgia, the University System of Georgia, and the Georgia Student
413 Finance Commission to develop and implement a data-driven methodology to determine
414 which careers merit inclusion on High-demand Career List, regionally or state wide. The
415 High-demand Career List shall:
416 (1) Include the skills, certificates, licenses, diplomas, degrees, or other credentials of
417 value required by employers for the high-demand careers included on the list; and
418 (2) Be published approved annually on or before December 31 on by the State
419 Workforce Development Board's public website. Board;
420 (3) Be submitted annually on or before December 31 by the State Workforce
421 Development Board to the Governor; the President of the Senate; the Speaker of the
422 House of Representatives; the respective chairs of the House Committee on Higher
423 Education, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the House Committee on
H. B. 192
- 17 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
424 Education, the Senate Higher Education Committee; and the Office of Planning and
425 Budget; and
426 (4) Be published annually on or before December 31 on the public websites of the State
427 Workforce Development Board, the Office of Student Achievement, the Department of
428 Education, the Technical College System of Georgia, the University System of Georgia,
429 and the Georgia Student Finance Commission.
430 (b) All state agencies and political subdivisions of the state, including local school
431 systems, shall utilize the High-demand Career List to inform their use of federal and state
432 funding for secondary, postsecondary, and adult education programs that lead to
433 certificates, licenses, diplomas, degrees, or other credentials of value in careers on the list
434 to ensure alignment with such list and effective use of funding by such entities."
435 SECTION 19.
436 Said chapter is further amended by adding new Code sections to read as follows:
437 "34-14-4.
438 (a) The State Workforce Development Board shall be responsible for oversight of a return
439 on investment analysis to evaluate and report on the effectiveness of secondary and
440 postsecondary programs aligned with the priority areas identified by the State Workforce
441 Development Board and included on the High-demand Career List published by the State
442 Workforce Development Board as provided in Code Section 34-14-3.
443 (b) As directed by the Governor, the State Workforce Development Board shall coordinate
444 and collaborate with the Office of Student Achievement, the Department of Education, the
445 Technical College System of Georgia, the University System of Georgia, and the Georgia
446 Student Finance Commission to develop the return on investment methodology utilizing
447 an analysis of data sources that include, but are not limited to, existing federal and state
448 resources, longitudinal outcome tracking of student information, enrollment and program
449 outcomes, and labor market analysis.
H. B. 192
- 18 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
450 (c) The evaluation and report required by this Code section shall include a comprehensive
451 review of student participation and outcomes, program alignment with labor market needs,
452 and recommendations for programmatic adjustments to better meet the needs of Georgia's
453 businesses, industries, and workforce and shall address, at a minimum, the following:
454 (1) The percentage of program graduates employed including retention rates and wage
455 growth over time;
456 (2) Comparison of graduates' average wages to state, national, and industry benchmarks,
457 with wage growth assessed at two-year, five-year, and ten-year intervals post-completion;
458 (3) The extent to which skills, certificates, licenses, diplomas, degrees, or other
459 credentials offered by the State Board of Education, the University System of Georgia,
460 and the Technical College System of Georgia align with the High-demand Career List
461 published by the State Workforce Development Board as provided in Code Section
462 34-14-3;
463 (4) The percentage of students, at both the secondary and post-secondary levels, that are
464 obtaining any credentials identified in paragraph (3) of this subsection; and
465 (5) Transparent information to stakeholders regarding program availability and
466 outcomes.
467 (d) The evaluation and report required by this Code section shall be:
468 (1) Approved by the State Workforce Development Board on or before December 1 of
469 each even-numbered year;
470 (2) Submitted by the State Workforce Development Board to the Governor; the President
471 of the Senate; the Speaker of the House of Representatives; the respective chairs of the
472 House Committee on Education, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the House
473 Committee on Higher Education, and the Senate Higher Education Committee; and the
474 Office of Planning and Budget; and
475 (3) Published on the public websites of the State Workforce Development Board, the
476 Office of Student Achievement, the Department of Education, the University System of
H. B. 192
- 19 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
477 Georgia, the Technical College System of Georgia, and the Georgia Student Finance
478 Commission on or before December 31 of each even-numbered year.
479 (e) All state agencies and political subdivisions of the state, including postsecondary
480 education institutions and local school systems, shall cooperate in collecting and sharing
481 all data and other pertinent information necessary for the implementation of the evaluation
482 and preparation of the report required by this Code section, subject to applicable privacy
483 protections, within a predetermined time frame as set by the State Workforce Development
484 Board. Such agencies and political subdivisions shall use the findings of the report to
485 recommend continuation, modification, or discontinuation of programs to better align with
486 workforce needs.
487 (f) The purpose of this Code section is to ensure the effective use of state resources,
488 prepare Georgians for high-demand career pathways, and support the state's economic
489 development by fostering a workforce aligned with employer needs.
490 34-14-5.
491 (a) The State Workforce Development Board shall develop and approve a report detailing
492 the alignment of policies, programs, and practices of the State Board of Education, the
493 Department of Education, the University System of Georgia, the Technical College System
494 of Georgia, and the Georgia Student Finance Commission that promotes and advances the
495 objectives of serving student needs, avoiding duplication of mission, using state resources
496 efficiently, and expanding opportunities for postsecondary credential attainment.
497 (b) As directed by the Governor, the State Workforce Development Board shall coordinate
498 and collaborate with the Department of Education, the University System of Georgia, and
499 the Technical College System of Georgia to create the report required by this Code section
500 that shall include the following:
H. B. 192
- 20 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
501 (1) A list of the courses articulated from the State Board of Education to the University
502 System of Georgia, the Technical College System of Georgia, and HOPE-eligible private
503 institutions;
504 (2) A list of the courses approved by the Board of Regents of the University System of
505 Georgia and the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia to be
506 transferrable between institutions of the university system and units of the technical
507 college system;
508 (3) Of the courses listed as provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection, identification
509 of the university system baccalaureate degree program or programs for which each such
510 course has been approved by the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia
511 to be a degree prerequisite;
512 (4) Of the courses listed as provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection, identification
513 of the technical college system degree program or programs for which each such course
514 has been approved by the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia to be
515 degree prerequisites;
516 (5) A summary of efforts undertaken by the Technical College System of Georgia in
517 collaboration with the University System of Georgia to reduce barriers to degree
518 completion by students who have earned course credits in the University System of
519 Georgia, the Technical College System of Georgia, or both;
520 (6) A list of the courses approved by HOPE-eligible private institutions and the State
521 Board of the Technical College System of Georgia to be transferrable between units of
522 the HOPE-eligible private institution and the technical college system;
523 (7) A list of the courses approved by HOPE-eligible private institutions and the Board
524 of Regents of the University System of Georgia to be transferrable between units of the
525 HOPE-eligible private institution and the university system;
526 (8) A summary of efforts undertaken to develop plans and procedures for reverse
527 transfers. As used in this paragraph, the term 'reverse transfer' means the process of
H. B. 192
- 21 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
528 transferring the credits a student has earned from a four-year institution to any unit of the
529 Technical College System of Georgia from which a student has transferred so that such
530 credits will be available to such student for purposes of his or her enrollment in or
531 completion of programs offered by the Technical College System of Georgia;
532 (9) A summary of the efforts undertaken on behalf of the Technical College System of
533 Georgia, the University System of Georgia, and the State Board of Education to comply
534 with the requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 20-4-20;
535 (10) A summary of efforts undertaken to align articulated, transferrable courses and
536 degree completion to the High-demand Career List published by the State Workforce
537 Development Board as provided in Code Section 34-14-3, including the total number of
538 articulation agreements aligned to the state's high-demand list for the State Board of
539 Education, the University System of Georgia, and the Technical College System of
540 Georgia;
541 (11) The number of students enrolled in programs of study provided for in subsection (a)
542 of Code Section 20-2-159.1 receiving articulated credit with the University System of
543 Georgia and the Technical College System of Georgia and which credits those students
544 receive; and
545 (12) Of the articulation agreements listed as provided for in paragraph (1) of this
546 subsection, identification of the number of articulated credits awarded, which institutions
547 awarded which credits, and the local school system or public school represented by the
548 students who earned such credits.
549 (c) The report required by this Code section shall be:
550 (1) Approved by the State Workforce Development Board on or before December 1 of
551 each even-numbered year;
552 (2) Submitted by the State Workforce Development Board to the Governor; the President
553 of the Senate; the Speaker of the House of Representatives; the respective chairs of the
554 House Committee on Education, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the House
H. B. 192
- 22 -

25 LC 49 2158-EC/AP
555 Committee on Higher Education, and the Senate Higher Education Committee; and the
556 Office of Planning and Budget; and
557 (3) Published on the public websites of the State Workforce Development Board, the
558 Office of Student Achievement, the Department of Education, the University System of
559 Georgia, the Technical College System of Georgia, and the Georgia Student Finance
560 Commission on or before December 31 of each even-numbered year.
561 (d) All relevant state agencies and educational institutions included in this process shall
562 cooperate in collecting and sharing data necessary for the preparation of the report required
563 by this Code section, subject to applicable privacy protections, within a predetermined time
564 frame as set by the State Workforce Development Board."
565 SECTION 20.
566 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 192
- 23 -